Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.030

Sale of franchise to corporation.

Notwithstanding the terms of any motor fuel franchise, no motor fuel refiner-supplier may prohibit or prevent the sale, assignment, or other transfer of the motor fuel franchise to a corporation in which the motor fuel retailer has and maintains a controlling interest if the motor fuel retailer offers in writing personally to guarantee the performance of the obligations under the motor fuel franchise.

[ 1986 c 320 s 4.]